New Jersey, session 222, A2858.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. Mobile sport fishing permit means a permit of any type, class, or duration which is made available by the department to allow for the operation of a motor vehicle on a beach for the purpose of fishing, including annual, 3-day, weekday, and daily mobile sport fishing permits. b.  The department shall sell mobile sport fishing permits in a manner that provides for an initial, 14-day time period during which only New Jersey residents are able to purchase the permits. c.  The department may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including rules and regulations prescribing the types of evidence that may be used to demonstrate that a person is a New Jersey resident. 2. This act shall take effect six months after the date of enactment, except that the Department of Environmental Protection may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.